Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.120

Vacancy, how filled.

(1) If a vacancy occurs in the office of judge of the superior court, the governor shall appoint a person to hold the office until the election and qualification of a judge to fill the vacancy, which election shall be at the next succeeding general election, and the judge so elected shall hold office for the remainder of the unexpired term.

(2) During any vacancy that occurs pursuant to subsection (1) of this section in a single judge court, a presiding judge pro tempore who has been predesignated pursuant to court rule or appointed pursuant to RCW 2.56.040(2) may fulfill presiding judge duties, and the authority of the predesignated or appointed presiding judge pro tempore endures until the chief justice appoints someone else to fulfill the presiding judge duties pursuant to RCW 2.56.040(2)(b), or until a vacancy in the position is filled as provided by law, whichever occurs first.

[ 2022 c 74 s 3; 1955 c 38 s 5. Prior: 1890 p 342 s 4; 1937 c 15 s 2; RRS s 11049.]

NOTES:

Superior court—Election of judges, terms of, etc.: State Constitution Art. 4 s 5.

Vacancies resulting from additional judgeships: RCW 2.08.069.